Louisiana, session 2026, HB1129.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:330.1(A)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§330.1. Sale of surplus property
A.(1)
* * *
(3) Where both in-state and out-of-state auctioneers are bidding, in-state
auctioneers shall be given preference, provided the services are equal in quality and
do not exceed cost by more than ten percent of services available from outside the
state. The provisions of this Paragraph shall apply to auctions conducted pursuant to
Paragraphs (1) and (2) of this Subsection.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1129 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.